pt-BR: Materiais de parede: Madeira de aspen; Madeira de cedro; Cicuta; Pinhal; Madeira de abeto; Outro
zh-CN: 墙体材料: 白杨木; 雪松木; 铁杉; 松树木材; 云杉木; 其他
en: Wall material: Aspen wood; Cedar wood; Hemlock; Pine wood; Spruce wood; Other
sv: Väggmaterial: Aspträ; Cederträ; Odört; Furu; Granträ; Övrigt
ro-RO: Material perete: Lemn de plop de munte; Lemn de cedru; Molid de Canada; Lemn de pin; Lemn de molid; Altele
zh-TW: 牆壁材質: 白楊木; 雪松木; 鐵杉; 松木材; 杉木; 其他
cs: Materiál stěny: Aspenové dřevo; Cedrové dřevo; Tsuga; Borovicové dřevo; Smrkové dřevo; Jiné
da: Vægmateriale: Aspetræ; Cedertræ; Hemlock; Fyrretræ; Grantræ; Andet
bg-BG: Материал на стена: Дървесина от трепетлика; Кедрова дървесина; Бучиниш; Борова дървесина; Смърчова дървeсина; Други
pt-PT: Material da parede: Madeira de Aspen; Madeira de cedro; Cicuta; Madeira de pinho; Madeira de abeto; Outro
ru: Материал стеки: Осина; Кедр; Болиголов; Сосна; Ель; Другое
ko: 벽 소재: 사시나무; 삼나무; 독당근; 소나무; 가문비나무; 기타
sk-SK: Materiál steny: Osikové drevo; Cédrové drevo; Jedľovec; Borovicové drevo; Smrekové drevo; Iné
it: Materiale della parete: Legno di pioppo tremulo; Legno di cedro; Cicuta; Legno di pino; Legno di abete rosso; Altro
ja: 壁の素材: アスペン材; 杉材; ヘムロック; パイン材; スプルース材; その他
el: Υλικό τοίχου: Ξύλο Ασπέν; Ξύλο κέδρου; Κώνειο; Ξύλο πεύκου; Ξύλο ελάτης; Άλλο
sl-SI: Stenski material: Trepetlikin les; Cedrov les; Čuga; Borov les; Smrekov les; Drugo
hr-HR: Materijal zida: Američka jasika; Cedrovina; Kukuta; Borovina; Smrekovina; Ostalo
tr: Duvar malzemesi: Kavak ağacı; Sedir ağacı; Baldıran otu; Çam ağacı; Ladin ağacı; Diğer
es: Material de la pared: Madera de chopo; Madera de cedro; Cicuta; Madera de pino; Madera de abeto; Otros
nl: Wandmateriaal: Espenhout; Cederhout; Dollekervel; Dennenhout; Vurenhout; Andere
fr: Matériau du mur: Bois de tremble; bois de cèdre; Ciguë; Bois vivant; Bois d’épicéa; Autre
pl: Materiał ściany: Drewno osikowe; Drewno cedrowe; Hemlock; Drewno sosnowe; Drewno świerkowe; Inne
vi: Chất liệu tường: Gỗ dương; Gỗ tuyết tùng; Cây độc cần; Gỗ thông; Gỗ vân sam; Khác
nb: Veggmateriale: Ospetre; Sedertre; Hemlokk; Furutre; Grantre; Annet
de: Wandmaterial: Espenholz; Zedernholz; Schierling; Pinienholz; Fichtenholz; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Sienelės medžiaga: Drebulės mediena; Kedro mediena; Dėmėtoji mauda; Pušies mediena; Eglės mediena; Kita
th: วัสดุสำหรับผนัง: ไม้แอสเพน; ไม้สนซีดาร์; เฮมล็อก; ไม้สน; ไม้สปรูซ; อื่นๆ
fi: Seinämateriaali: Haapa puuta; Seetripuu; Katko; Mäntypuu; Kuusi; Muu
hu: Fal anyaga: Nyárfa; Cédrusfa; Bürök; Fenyőfa; Lucfenyő; Egyéb